Utah statutes.
72-5-201.   Purpose statement.
(1) (a)  The Legislature recognizes that highways provide tangible benefits to
private and public lands of the state by providing access, allowing
development, and facilitating production of income.
(b)  Many of those highways traverse state lands, including lands held by the
state in trust for the school children and public institutions of the state.
(c)  Many of the existing highways have been previously established without an
official grant of an easement or right of entry from this state, yet these
highways often are the only access to private and public lands of the state.
(2)  The Legislature intends to establish a means for ensuring continued
access to the private and public lands of the state for the good of the
people, while fulfilling its fiduciary responsibilities toward the
schoolchildren by protecting their trust holdings against loss.
